Utah statutes.
32B-11-603.   Commission's power to issue local industry representative license.

(1) (a)  Before a person described in Subsection (2) may represent an alcoholic product of a manufacturer, supplier, or importer, the person shall obtain a local industry representative license from the commission in accordance with this part.

(b)  A violation of this Subsection (1) is a class B misdemeanor.

(2)  The commission may issue a local industry representative license to a person who is:

(a) (i)  an individual resident of Utah;

(ii)  a Utah partnership;

(iii)  a Utah corporation; or

(iv)  a Utah limited liability company; and

(b)  employed by a manufacturer, supplier, or importer, to represent a liquor product with the department, a package agency, licensee, or permittee under this title, whether compensated by salary, commission, or another means.

(3)  An individual staff member of a local industry representative licensee is not required to be separately licensed.

(4)  A local industry representative may represent more than one manufacturer, supplier, or importer at a time.

(5) (a)  A manufacturer, supplier, or importer is not required to use a local industry representative to represent its products with the department, a package agency, licensee, or permittee, except that staff of a manufacturer, supplier, or importer who is not a local industry representative shall register with the department, on a form provided by the department, before the staff represents an alcoholic product while in the state with the department, a package agency, licensee, or permittee.

(b)  A manufacturer, supplier, or importer described in Subsection (5)(a) and its staff are subject to the same operational requirements of this part and Chapter 4, Criminal Offenses and Procedure Act.

